District of Columbia statutes.
31-4726

Commissioner’s review of test.

(a)

The Commissioner, in his discretion, may, under subsection (b) of this section, permit the use of a form that scores inadequately under § 31-4725(a)(1).

(b)

Before the Commissioner permits the use of inadequately scoring forms, the Commissioner shall find that:

(1)

A lower score more accurately reflects the readability of the form.

(2)

The particular nature of the form or of a type of form warrants a lower passing score than required by § 31-4725(a)(1).

(3)

Policy language drafted to conform with state law or state agency interpretation of the law has impaired the readability of the rest of the policy or has otherwise lowered the score for the rest of the policy.

History

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. V, § 26
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(h), 32 DCR 39
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 25(i), 33 DCR 7836
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 23(e), 45 DCR 745

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-4725 and § 31-4730.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-532.